Alabama, session 2026rs, HB159.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 12-18-166 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§12-18-166
(a) No individual may participate in both a
supernumerary circuit clerk program and the Employees’
Retirement System based on the same service.
(b) An individual who independently qualifies for a
supernumerary circuit clerk program and the Employees'
Retirement System based on separate years of service may
participate in both programs.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on July 1,
2026.
Page 1

2026.
HB159 Enrolled






________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 05-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 26-Feb-26 Passed



Page 2